California, session 20252026, AB2574.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 31621 of the Food and Agricultural Code is amended to read:31621. (a) If an animal control officer or a law enforcement officer has investigated and determined that there exists probable cause to believe that a dog is potentially dangerous or vicious, the chief officer of the public animal shelter or animal control department, the chief officer’s immediate supervisor, the head of the local law enforcement agency, or the agency head’s designee, shall petition the superior court of the county in which the dog is owned or kept for a hearing for the purpose of determining whether or not the dog should be declared potentially dangerous or vicious.(b) (1) A proceeding under this section is a limited civil case.(2) A city or county may establish an administrative hearing procedure to hear and dispose of petitions filed pursuant to this chapter.(c) A complaint received from a member of the public that serves as the evidentiary basis for the animal control officer or law enforcement officer to find probable cause shall be sworn to and verified by the complainant and shall be attached to the petition.(d) (1) The chief officer of the public animal shelter or animal control department or head of the local law enforcement agency shall notify the owner or keeper of the dog that a hearing will be held by the superior court or the hearing entity, as the case may be, at which time the owner or keeper of the dog may present evidence as to why the dog should not be declared potentially dangerous or vicious.(2) The owner or keeper of the dog shall be served with notice of the hearing and a copy of the petition, either personally or by first-class mail with return receipt requested.(e) The hearing shall be held promptly within no less than five working days and not more than 10 working days after service of notice upon the owner or keeper of the dog.(f) The hearing shall be open to the public. At least five working days before each public hearing, the court or hearing entity shall post notice of the public hearing required by this section in an easily identifiable and accessible location of the court or hearing entity’s internet website.(g) (1) The court or hearing entity shall admit into evidence all relevant evidence, including incident reports and the affidavits of witnesses.(2) The court or hearing entity may limit the scope of discovery and may shorten the time to produce records or witnesses, but only when necessary to prevent delay of the proceeding or prevent undue hardship to a party or witness.(h) The court may find, upon a preponderance of the evidence, that the dog is potentially dangerous or vicious and make other orders authorized by this chapter.(i) Notwithstanding Section 31683, this section shall apply to all cities and counties.SEC. 2. Section 31622 of the Food and Agricultural Code is amended to read:31622. (a) (1) After the hearing conducted pursuant to Section 31621, the owner or keeper of the dog shall be notified in writing of the determination, explicit factual findings that support that determination, and orders issued, either personally or by first-class mail postage prepaid by the court or hearing entity.(2) If a determination is made that the dog is potentially dangerous or vicious, the owner or keeper of the dog shall comply with Article 3 (commencing with Section 31641) in accordance with a time schedule established by the chief officer of the public animal shelter or animal control department or the head of the local law enforcement agency, but in no case more than 30 days after the date of the determination or 35 days if notice of the determination is mailed to the owner or keeper of the dog.(b) (1) If the petitioner or the owner or keeper of the dog contests the determination, they may, within five days of the receipt of the notice of determination, appeal the decision of the court or hearing entity of original jurisdiction.(2) An appeal to the decision of the court or hearing entity of original jurisdiction shall be to the appellate division of the superior court.(3) The petitioner or the owner or keeper of the dog shall serve personally or by first-class mail, postage prepaid, notice of the appeal upon the other party. (c) (1) The court hearing the appeal shall conduct a hearing de						novo novo, without a jury, and make its own determination as to potential danger and viciousness and make other orders authorized by this chapter, based upon the evidence presented.(2) The hearing shall be conducted in the same manner and within the time periods set forth in Section 31621 and subdivision (a).(3) (A) The court shall admit all relevant evidence, including incident reports and the affidavits of witnesses.(B) The court may limit the scope of discovery, and may shorten the time to produce records or witnesses, but only when necessary to prevent delay of the proceeding or prevent undue hardship to a party or witness.(4) The issue shall be decided by clear and convincing evidence. the same evidentiary standard applied during the initial hearing, as described in Section 31621.(d) If the court rules the dog to be potentially dangerous or vicious, the court may establish a time schedule to ensure compliance with this chapter, but in no case more than 30 days subsequent to the date of the court’s determination or 35 days if the service of the judgment is by first-class mail.(e) Notwithstanding Section 31683, this section shall apply to all cities and counties.SEC. 3. Section 31624 of the Food and Agricultural Code is repealed.SEC. 4. Section 31625.5 is added to the Food and Agricultural Code, to read:31625.5. (a) Notwithstanding Section 31683, if a dog is seized and impounded by a law enforcement or animal control officer pending a hearing pursuant to Section 31621, the law enforcement or animal control officer shall provide a notice of rights to the owner or keeper of the dog at the same time as the notice of hearing pursuant to Section 31621, either personally or by first-class mail with return receipt requested. The notice of rights shall include both of the following: (1) A detailed description of the reason the owner’s or keeper’s dog is being seized and impounded pending adjudication of whether or not the dog is potentially dangerous or vicious pursuant to Sections 31621 and 31625.(2) Information on the hearing pursuant to Section 31621, including all of the following:(A) The owner’s or keeper’s right to a hearing by an impartial hearing officer or judge before any potentially dangerous or vicious designation of the dog.(B) Notice that the hearing will be held no less than five working days and not more than 10 working days from the date of the service of notice on the owner or keeper of the dog pursuant to Section 31621.(C) The owner’s or keeper’s right to legal representation, full access and review of all evidence considered by the investigating law enforcement or animal control agency, including witness statements and contact information, present evidence in defense of the dog, including having witnesses appear on the owner’s or keeper’s behalf, and confront witnesses during the hearing.(b) If served personally, the person serving the notice shall affirm the validity and document all of the following:(1) The location at which the notice was served.(2) The date and time the notice was served.(3) To the extent feasible, the name of the person provided the notice.(c) The law enforcement or animal control officer providing the notice of rights shall maintain a copy of the return mailing receipt or the signed affirmation specified in subdivision (b) for no less than six months following the exhaustion of all appeals.SEC. 5. The Legislature finds and declares that Sections 1, 2, and 4 of this act amending Sections 31621 and 31622 of, and adding Section 31625.5 to, the Food and Agricultural Code address a matter of statewide concern rather than a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Sections 1, 2, and 4 of this act apply to all counties and cities, including charter counties and charter cities.SEC. 6. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.